Hawaii statutes.
[§134-53] Butterfly knives; prohibitions;
penalty. (a) Whoever knowingly manufactures, sells, transfers, possesses,
or transports in the State any butterfly knife, being a knife having a blade
encased in a split handle that manually unfolds with hand or wrist action with
the assistance of inertia, gravity or both, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) Whoever knowingly possesses or
intentionally uses or threatens to use a butterfly knife while engaged in the
commission of a crime shall be guilty of a class C felony. [L 1999, c 285, §1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next